Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.84.020

Failure to disperse.

(1) A person is guilty of failure to disperse if:

(a) He or she congregates with a group of three or more other persons and there are acts of conduct within that group which create a substantial risk of causing injury to any person, or substantial harm to property; and

(b) He or she refuses or fails to disperse when ordered to do so by a peace officer or other public servant engaged in enforcing or executing the law.

(2) Failure to disperse is a misdemeanor.

[ 2011 c 336 s 410; 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.84.020.]